Maryland, session 2026, SB0583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0583*

SENATE BILL 583
(b) “Administration” means the Developmental Disabilities Administration.
(f) “Deputy Secretary” means the Deputy Secretary for Developmental
Disabilities.
(w) (1) “Self–directed services” means waiver program services:
(i) For which participants or their representatives have
decision–making authority over and take direct responsibility for management of the
services with the assistance of available supports chosen by the participant or the
participant’s representative; and
(ii) That are provided in a manner that:
1. Furthers the right of individuals and their
representatives, as applicable, to make choices about and direct all aspects of their lives,
including by choosing and controlling the delivery of waiver services, who provides the
services, and how services are provided; and
2. Recognizes that all individuals have the capacity to make
choices and may be supported in making choices.
(2) “Self–directed services” includes services that:
(i) Provide an individual with:
1. The decision–making employer authority to recruit, hire,
train, supervise, and dismiss the employees and vendors who furnish the individual’s
services; and
2. The budget authority over how funds in a budget are spent
within the total approved annual budget;
(ii) Maximize the opportunities of an individual to live as
independently as possible in the most inclusive community–based setting of the
individual’s choice;
(iii) Empower an individual to exercise choice and control over
needed long–term services and supports; and
(iv) Help to maintain and improve the individual’s health and quality
of life in the individual’s community.
(x) “Services” means residential, day, or other services that provide for
evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, care, supervision, assistance, or attention to individuals
with developmental disability and that promote habilitation of these individuals.

SENATE BILL 583 3
7–409.1.
(A) THE DEPUTY SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE PUBLIC
BEFORE MAKING CHANGES TO THE SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES MANUAL
DEVELOPED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(B) IF THE DEPUTY SECRETARY PROPOSES TO MAKE CHANGES TO THE
SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES MANUAL, THE DEPUTY SECRETARY SHALL RECEIVE
AND CONSIDER COMMENTS ON THE PROPOSED CHANGES FROM THE PUBLIC FOR A
PERIOD OF AT LEAST 90 DAYS AFTER THE DATE NOTICE IS PROVIDED TO THE PUBLIC
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE DEPUTY SECRETARY MAY NOT ADOPT THE PROPOSED CHANGES
UNTIL AFTER THE PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION HAS ENDED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.